Delaware, session 153, HB109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 8306, Title 9 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8306. Standard of assessment; frequency of reassessment. (b) (1) All real property must be reassessed by the county in which the real property is located at least once every 5 10 years. (2) Each 5-year 10-year period under paragraph (b)(1) of this section starts on the date a county board of assessment adopts a certification under Â§ 8314 of this title reflecting the completion of a general reassessment of all real property within that county.